Missouri, session 2026, SB1279.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 166.435, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 166.435,
to read as follows:
166.435. 1. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
the assets of the program held by the board, the assets of
any deposit program authorized in section 166.500, and the
assets of any qualified tuition program established pursuant
to Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code and any income
therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation by the state or
any of its political subdivisions. Income earned or
received from the program, deposit, or other qualified
tuition programs established under Section 529 of the
Internal Revenue Code, or refunds of qualified education
expenses received by a beneficiary from an eligible
educational institution in connection with withdrawal from
enrollment at such institution which are contributed within
sixty days of withdrawal to a qualified tuition program of
which such individual is a beneficiary shall not be subject
to state income tax imposed pursuant to chapter 143 and
shall be eligible for any benefits provided in accordance
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1279 2
with Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code. The
exemption from taxation pursuant to this section shall apply
only to assets and income maintained, accrued, or expended
pursuant to the requirements of the program established
pursuant to sections 166.400 to 166.455, the deposit program
established pursuant to sections 166.500 to 166.529, and
other qualified tuition programs established under Section
529 of the Internal Revenue Code, and no exemption shall
apply to assets and income expended for any other purposes.
Annual contributions made to the program held by the board,
the deposit program, and any qualified tuition program
established under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code
[up to and including eight thousand dollars per taxpayer,
and up to sixteen thousand dollars for married individuals
filing a joint tax return,] shall be subtracted in
determining Missouri adjusted gross income pursuant to
section 143.121.
2. If any deductible contributions to or earnings from
any such program referred to in this section are distributed
and not used to pay qualified education expenses, not
transferred as allowed by 26 U.S.C. Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i),
as amended, and any Internal Revenue Service regulations or
guidance issued in relation thereto, or are not held for the
minimum length of time established by the appropriate
Missouri board, then the amount so distributed shall be
included in the Missouri adjusted gross income of the
participant, or, if the participant is not living, the
beneficiary.
3. The provisions of this section shall apply to tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2008, and the
provisions of this section with regard to sections 166.500

SB 1279 3
to 166.529 shall apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2004.
✓